New Jersey, session 222, S3611.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-4) is amended to read as follows: 3.1. "Data center" means a facility in this State: (1) whose primary services are the storage, management, and processing of digital data, including, but not limited to, artificial intelligence applications; and (2) that is used to house computer and network systems, including associated components such as servers, network equipment and appliances, telecommunications, and data storage systems, systems for monitoring and managing infrastructure performance, Internet-related equipment and services, data communications connections, environmental controls, fire protection systems, and security systems and services. "Days" means calendar days. "Density" means the permitted number of dwelling units per gross area of land that is the subject of an application for development, including noncontiguous land, if authorized by municipal ordinance or by a planned development. "Developer" means the legal or beneficial owner or owners of a lot or of any land proposed to be included in a proposed development, including the holder of an option or contract to purchase, or other person having an enforceable proprietary interest in such land. "Development" means the division of a parcel of land into two or more parcels, the construction, reconstruction, conversion, structural alteration, relocation or enlargement of any building or other structure, or of any mining excavation or landfill, and any use or change in the use of any building or other structure, or land or extension of use of land, for which permission may be required pursuant to P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.). "Development potential" means the maximum number of dwelling units or square feet of nonresidential floor area that may be constructed on a specified lot or in a specified zone under the master plan and land use regulations in effect on the date of the adoption of the development transfer ordinance or on the date of the adoption of the ordinance authorizing noncontiguous cluster, and in accordance with recognized environmental constraints. "Development regulation" means a zoning ordinance, subdivision ordinance, site plan ordinance, official map ordinance or other municipal regulation of the use and development of land, or amendment thereto adopted and filed pursuant to P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.). "Development restriction" means an agricultural restriction, a conservation restriction, or a historic preservation restriction. "Development transfer" or "development potential transfer" means the conveyance of development potential, or the permission for development, from one or more lots to one or more other lots by deed, easement, or other means as authorized by ordinance. "Development transfer bank" means a development transfer bank established pursuant to section 22 of P.L.2004, c.2 (C.40:55D-158) or the State TDR Bank. "Drainage" means the removal of surface water or groundwater from land by drains, grading or other means and includes control of runoff during and after construction or development to minimize erosion and sedimentation, to assure the adequacy of existing and proposed culverts and bridges, to induce water recharge into the ground where practical, to lessen nonpoint pollution, to maintain the integrity of stream channels for their biological functions as well as for drainage, and the means necessary for water supply preservation or prevention or alleviation of flooding. "Electric vehicle supply equipment" or "electric vehicle service equipment" or "EVSE" means the equipment, including the cables, cords, conductors, connectors, couplers, enclosures, attachment plugs, power outlets, power electronics, transformer, switchgear, switches and controls, network interfaces, and point of sale equipment and associated apparatus designed and used for the purpose of transferring energy from the electric supply system to a plug-in electric vehicle.  "EVSE" may deliver either alternating current or, consistent with fast charging equipment standards, direct current electricity. "EVSE" is synonymous with "electric vehicle charging station." "Environmental commission" means a municipal advisory body created pursuant to P.L.1968, c.245 (C.40:56A-1 et seq.). "Erosion" means the detachment and movement of soil or rock fragments by water, wind, ice and gravity. "Final approval" means the official action of the planning board taken on a preliminarily approved major subdivision or site plan, after all conditions, engineering plans and other requirements have been completed or fulfilled and the required improvements have been installed or guarantees properly posted for their completion, or approval conditioned upon the posting of such guarantees. "Floor area ratio" means the sum of the area of all floors of buildings or structures compared to the total area of land that is the subject of an application for development, including noncontiguous land, if authorized by municipal ordinance or by a planned development. "General development plan" means a comprehensive plan for the development of a planned development, as provided in section 4 of P.L.1987, c.129 (C.40:55D-45.2). "Governing body" means the chief legislative body of the municipality.  In municipalities having a board of public works, "governing body" means such board. "Historic district" means one or more historic sites and intervening or surrounding property significantly affecting or affected by the quality and character of the historic site or sites. "Historic preservation restriction" means a "historic preservation restriction" as defined in section 2 of P.L.1979, c.378 (C.13:8B-2). "Historic site" means any real property, man-made structure, natural object or configuration or any portion or group of the foregoing of historical, archeological, cultural, scenic or architectural significance. "Inherently beneficial use" means a use which is universally considered of value to the community because it fundamentally serves the public good and promotes the general welfare.  Such a use includes, but is not limited to, a hospital, school, child care center, group home, or a wind, solar or photovoltaic energy facility or structure. "Instrument" means the easement, credit, or other deed restriction used to record a development transfer. "Interested party" means: (a) in a criminal or quasi-criminal proceeding, any citizen of the State of New Jersey; and (b) in the case of a civil proceeding in any court or in an administrative proceeding before a municipal agency, any person, whether residing within or without the municipality, whose right to use, acquire, or enjoy property is or may be affected by any action taken under P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), or whose rights to use, acquire, or enjoy property under P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), or under any other law of this State or of the United States have been denied, violated or infringed by an action or a failure to act under P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.). "Land" includes improvements and fixtures on, above or below the surface. "Local utility" means any sewerage authority created pursuant to the "sewerage authorities law," P.L.1946, c.138 (C.40:14A-1 et seq.); any utilities authority created pursuant to the "municipal and county utilities authorities law," P.L.1957, c.183 (C.40:14B-1 et seq.); or any utility, authority, commission, special district or other corporate entity not regulated by the Board of Regulatory Commissioners under Title 48 of the Revised Statutes that provides gas, electricity, heat, power, water or sewer service to a municipality or the residents thereof. "Lot" means a designated parcel, tract or area of land established by a plat or otherwise, as permitted by law and to be used, developed or built upon as a unit. (cf: P.L.2021, c.171, s.5) 2.    Section 34 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-46) is amended to read as follows: 34.  a.  An ordinance requiring site plan review and approval shall require that  the developer submit to the administrative officer a site plan and [such] any other information as is reasonably necessary to make an informed decision as to whether the requirements necessary for preliminary site plan approval have been met.  The site plan and any engineering documents to be submitted shall be required in tentative form for discussion purposes for preliminary approval.  If any architectural plans are required to be submitted for site plan approval, the preliminary plans and elevations shall be sufficient. b.    If the planning board required any substantial amendment in the layout of improvements proposed by the developer that have been the subject of a hearing, an amended application for development shall be submitted and proceeded upon, as in the case of the original application for development.  The planning board shall, if the proposed development complies with the ordinance and [this act] P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), grant preliminary site plan approval. c.     Upon the submission to the administrative officer of a complete application for a site plan which involves 10 acres of land or less, and 10 dwelling units or less, the planning board shall grant or deny preliminary approval within 45 days of the date of [such] the submission or within [such] a further time as may be consented to by the developer.  Upon the submission of a complete application for a site plan which involves more than 10 acres, or more than 10 dwelling units, the planning board shall grant or deny preliminary approval within 95 days of the date of [such] the submission or within [such] a further time as may be consented to by the developer. Otherwise, the planning board shall be deemed to have granted preliminary approval of the site plan. d.    A planning board that receives a complete application for a site plan for the development of a data center shall submit the site plan and all other information received from the developer to the State Planning Commission and the Board of Public Utilities, for review pursuant to subsection c. of section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50), the cost of which shall be determined by municipality and charged to the developer. (cf: P.L.1984, c.20, s.8) 3.    Section 36 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-48) is amended to read as follows: 36.  a.  An ordinance requiring subdivision approval by the planning board shall require that the developer submit to the administrative officer a plat and [such] any other information as is reasonably necessary to make an informed decision as to whether the requirements necessary for preliminary approval have been met; provided that minor subdivisions pursuant to section 35 of [this act] P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-47) shall not be subject to this section.  The plat and any other engineering documents to be submitted shall be required in tentative form for discussion purposes for preliminary approval. b.    If the planning board required any substantial amendment in the layout of improvements proposed by the developer that have been the subject of a hearing, an amended application shall be submitted and proceeded upon, as in the case of the original application for development.  The planning board shall, if the proposed subdivision complies with the ordinance and [this act] P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), grant preliminary approval to the subdivision. c.     Upon the submission to the administrative officer of a complete application for a subdivision of 10 or fewer lots, the planning board shall grant or deny preliminary approval within 45 days of the date of [such] the submission or within [such] a further time as may be consented to by the developer.  Upon the submission of a complete application for a subdivision of more than 10 lots, the planning board shall grant or deny preliminary approval within 95 days of the date of [such] the submission or within [such] a further time as may be consented to by the developer.  Otherwise, the planning board shall be deemed to have granted preliminary approval to the subdivision. d.    A planning board that receives a complete application for a major subdivision that includes development of a data center shall submit the plat and all other information received from the developer to the State Planning Commission and the Board of Public Utilities, for review pursuant to subsection c. of section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50), the cost of which shall be determined by municipality and charged to the developer. (cf: P.L.1984, c.20, s.9) 4.    Section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50) is amended to read as follows: 38.  Final approval of site plans and major subdivisions. a.     The planning board shall grant final approval if the detailed drawings, specifications and estimates of the application for final approval conform to the standards established by ordinance for final approval, the conditions of preliminary approval and, in the case of a major subdivision, the standards prescribed by N.J.S.46:26B-1 et seq.; provided that in the case of a planned development, the planning board may permit minimal deviations from the conditions of preliminary approval necessitated by change of conditions beyond the control of the developer since the date of preliminary approval without the developer being required to submit another application for development for preliminary approval. b.    Final approval shall be granted or denied within 45 days after submission of a complete application to the administrative officer, or within [such] a further time as may be consented to by the applicant.  Failure of the planning board to act within the period prescribed shall constitute final approval and a certificate of the administrative officer as to the failure of the planning board to act shall be issued on request of the applicant, and it shall be sufficient in lieu of the written endorsement or other evidence of approval, herein required, and shall be so accepted by the county recording officer for purposes of filing subdivision plats. Whenever review or approval of the application by the county planning board is required by section 5 of P.L.1968, c. 285 (C. 40:27-6.3), in the case of a subdivision, or section 8 of P.L.1968, c. 285 (C. 40:27-6.6), in the case of a site plan, the municipal planning board shall condition any approval that it grants upon timely receipt of a favorable report on the application by the county planning board or approval by the county planning board by its failure to report thereon within the required time period. c.     The planning board shall not grant final approval of a site plan or major subdivision for development of a data center unless the planning board has submitted the plan to the State Planning Commission and the State Planning Commission has granted final approval.  The State Planning Commission, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall have 45 days from the date of submission by the planning board to review and approve or deny the site plan or major subdivision for the development of a data center.  The State Planning Commission and Board of Public Utilities may consider the impacts and appropriateness of a proposed site plan or major subdivision with respect to the most recently adopted State Development and Redevelopment Plan, local land use and development regulations, and any laws, rules, regulations, or programs enforced or administered by the State Planning Commission or Board of Public Utilities, respectively.  If the State Planning Commission does not issue an approval or denial within 45 days, the State Planning Commission shall be deemed to have granted final approval of the site plan or major subdivision. (cf: P.L.2013, c.106, s.12) 5.    (New section)  The development of a data center, as defined in section 3.1 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-4), shall not be eligible for any economic development subsidy. As used in this section: "Economic development subsidy" means the provision of an amount of funds to a recipient business by or from a State public body with a value of greater than $25,000, including, but not limited to, any bond, grant, loan, loan guarantee, matching fund, tax credit, or other tax expenditure.  "Economic development subsidy" shall not mean any contract under which a State public body purchases or otherwise procures goods, services, or construction on an unsubsidized basis, including any contract solely for the construction or renovation of a facility owned by a State public body. 6.    (New section)  The State Planning Commission, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations, to effectuate the purposes of subsection c. of section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50). 7.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to applications for development of data centers submitted on or after the effective date of this act.